Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.487

Low-income home rehabilitation grant program—Contracts with rehabilitation agencies—Reports.

(1) The department must contract with rehabilitation agencies to provide home rehabilitation to participating homeowners. Preference must be given to local agencies delivering programs and services with similar eligibility criteria.

(2) Any rehabilitation agency receiving funding under this section must report to the department at least quarterly, or in alignment with federal reporting, whichever is the greater frequency, the project costs and the number of homes repaired or rehabilitated. The department must review the accuracy of these reports.

[ 2023 c 380 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 380 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 43.330.483.